Illinois, session 104th, SB715.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Authorized Electronic Monitoring in 5Long-Term Care Facilities Act is amended by changing Section 1 6as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 32/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Authorized Electronic Monitoring in Long-Term Care Facilities 10Act.11(Source: P.A. 99-430, eff. 1-1-16.)